West Virginia, session 2025, HB2639.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. State Board of Education. §18-2-46. Electronic calculators prohibited for grades pre-kindergarten through six. Public schools located in this state may not permit students from grades pre-kindergarten through six to use electronic calculators of any kind.